Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
523A

[UNCLAIMED
PROPERTY]

Part I. Uniform Unclaimed Property Act

Section

523A-1 Short title

523A-2 Definitions

523A-3 Presumptions of abandonment

523A-3.5 Gift certificates and gift cards

523A-4 Contents of safe deposit box or other
safekeeping

depository

523A-5 Rules of taking custody

523A-6 Dormancy charge

523A-7 Burden of proof as to property evidenced
by record of

check or draft

523A-8 Report of abandoned property

523A-9 Payment or delivery of abandoned property

523A-10 Notice and publication of lists of
abandoned property

523A-11 Custody by State; recovery by holder;
defense of

holder

523A-12 Crediting of dividends, interest, and
increments to

owner's account

523A-13 Public sale of abandoned property

523A-14 Claim of another state to recover
property

523A-15 Filing claim with administrator; handling
of claims

by administrator

523A-16 Action to establish claim

523A-17 Election to take payment or delivery

523A-18 Destruction or disposition of property
having no

substantial commercial value; immunity
from liability

523A-19 Periods of limitation

523A-20 Requests for reports and examination of
records

523A-21 Retention of records

523A-22 Enforcement

523A-23 Interstate agreements and cooperation;
joint and

reciprocal actions with other states

523A-24 Interest and penalties

523A-25 Agreement to locate property

523A-26 Deposit of funds

523A-27 Foreign transactions

523A-28 Transitional provisions

523A-29 Rules

523A-30 Uniformity of application and
construction

Part II. Unclaimed Property Held by the
United States

523A-51 Declaration of policy

523A-52 Definitions

523A-53 Unclaimed property subject to delivery to
State;

presumptions

523A-54 Request by director of finance for report
of

previously unreported information

523A-55 Agreement for State's payment of share of
costs

523A-56 Posting copy of report; notice of interest
and

intention to claim; determination of
asserted

interest

523A-57 State's right unaffected by expiration of
time for

proceeding

523A-58 Petition for determination of State's
right to custody

of unclaimed property; venue; service not
required

523A-59 Notice of proceedings

523A-60 Answer; disposition of funds on deposit;
dismissal

without prejudice

523A-61 Application for judgment relating to
property not

claimed by answer, and finding and
declaration

thereon

523A-62 Request for delivery or payment of
unclaimed property

described in judgment; receipts

523A-63 Disposition of property received

523A-64 Undertaking to hold the United States
harmless;

intervention by state attorney general

523A-65 State rights not affected

Revision Note

Chapter heading changed by revisor.

Attorney General Opinions

Act 214, L 1996, which amended Hawaii's unclaimed property
law to permit escheat of abandoned property, was constitutional;
recommendations regarding notice of custodial taking and escheat notice,
discussed. Att. Gen. Op. 98-4.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next